Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,121
Judicial action.

(MBCA 8.61) (a) A transaction effected
or proposed to be effected by the corporation, or by an entity controlled
by the corporation, may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise
to an award of damages or other sanctions against a director of the corporation,
in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation
on the ground that the director has an interest respecting the transaction
if it is not a director's conflicting interest transaction.

(b) A director's conflicting
interest transaction may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise
to an award of damages or other sanctions against a director of the corporation,
in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation
on the ground that the director has an interest respecting the transaction
if:

(1)
Directors' action respecting the transaction was taken in compliance with
section 21-2,122 at any time;

(2) Shareholders' action respecting the transaction
was taken in compliance with section 21-2,123 at any time; or

(3) The transaction,
judged according to the circumstances at the relevant time, is established
to have been fair to the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 121.
January 1, 2016